District of Columbia statutes.
16-308

Investigations when prospective adoptee is adult or petitioner is spouse or domestic partner of natural parent.

(a)

The court may dispense with the investigation, report, and interlocutory decree provided for by this chapter when:

(1)

The prospective adoptee is an adult; or

(2)

The petitioner is a spouse or domestic partner of the natural parent of the prospective adoptee and the natural parents consents to the adoption or joins in the petition for adoption.

(b)

In the circumstances specified in subsection (a)(2) of this section, the petition need not contain the information concerning race and religion as specified in § 16-305(4) and (5).

(c)

For the purposes of this section, the term “domestic partner” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 32-701(3), but shall exclude a domestic partner who is the parent, grandparent, sibling, child, grandchild, niece, nephew, aunt, or uncle of the natural parent.

(d)

Nothing in this section shall be construed to waive the requirements of §§ 4-1305.01 through 4-1305.09, including the requirement of a fingerprint-based criminal records check.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 539, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
Oct. 30, 1975, D.C. Law 1-25, § 3, 22 DCR 2465
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 18-33, § 3(a), 56 DCR 4269
Sept. 11, 2009, D.C. Law 18-47, § 3, 56 DCR 4960

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-307.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-308.
1973 Ed., § 16-308.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-33 rewrote the section.
D.C. Law 18-47 rewrote the section.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of the Adoption and Safe Families Temporary Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Law 17-133, March 26, 2008, law notification 55 DCR 4464).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of the Safe families Continuing Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Law 17-297, March 20, 2009, law notification 56 DCR 3008).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Adoption and Safe Families Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-232, December 27, 2007, 55 DCR 233).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Adoption and Safe Families Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-317, March 19, 2008, 55 DCR 3415).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Adoption and Safe Families Continuing Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-559, October 27, 2008, 55 DCR 12010).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Adoption and Safe Families Continuing Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-2, January 23, 2009, 56 DCR 1622).